src/fst/morphology/affixes/inflections-verbs-TV.lexc
LEXICON XTOpt_ImpX2 !! Et særligt leksikon til tilhæng som RIANNGUAR+Der/vv
+V+Imp+2Sg+1SgO:%>%TRUNCnnga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Sg+1PlO:%>tigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Sg+3SgO:%>%TRUNCguk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Sg+3PlO:%>%TRUNCkkit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+1Pl+3SgO:%>tigu K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+1Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>tigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+1Pl+3PlO:%>tigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Pl+1SgO:%>singa K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Pl+1PlO:%>tigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Pl+3SgO:%>siuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>sigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO:%>sigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+2SgO:%>lakkit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+3SgO:%>lara K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Sg+3PlO:%>lakka K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+2SgO:%>latsigit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+2PlO:%>lassi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+3SgO:%>larput K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl+3PlO:%>lavut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+1Pl:%>%TRUNCkisa K ; !reciprok
+V+Opt+3Sg+1SgO:%>linga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+2SgO:%>lisit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+3SgO:%>liuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Sg+3PlO:%>ligit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+1SgO:%>linnga K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+1PlO:%>lisigut K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+2SgO:%>litsit K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+2PlO:%>lisi K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3SgO:%>lissuk K_TUQ ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO+Orth/Arch:%>lisigik K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv
+V+Opt+3Pl+3PlO:%>lisigit K_TUQ_plur ; !flex-tv

LEXICON XTgujaaX !!= * @CODE@ 
 XTgujaaX2 ;
  +Gram/Refl@U.Refl.On@:@U.Refl.On@ XIgujoqX ;

LEXICON XTgujaaX2 !!= * @CODE@ 
+V+Ind+1Sg+2SgO:%>%VTRUNCujakkit K ;
+V+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:%>%VTRUNCujara K ;
+V+Ind+1Sg+3PlO:%>%VTRUNCujakka K ;
+V+Ind+2Sg+1PlO:%>%VTRUNCujatsigut K_TUQ ;
+V+Ind+3Sg+1SgO:%>%VTRUNCujaanga K ; 
+V+Ind+3Sg+3SgO:%>%VTRUNCujaa K ; 
+V+Ind+3Sg+3PlO:%>%VTRUNCujai K_plur ;
+V+Ind+1Pl+3SgO:%>%VTRUNCujarput K_plur ;
+V+Ind+1Pl+3PlO:%>%VTRUNCujavut K ;
+V+Ind+3Pl+3SgO:%>%VTRUNCujaat K ; 
+V+Ind+3Pl+3PlO:%>%VTRUNCujaat K_plur ;
+V+Imp+2Sg+1SgO:%>nga K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Sg+3SgO:%>uk K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Sg+1PlO:%>sigut K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Sg+3PlO:%>kkit K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+1SgO:%>singa K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+3SgO:%>siuk K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+1PlO:%>tigut K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+1PlO+Orth/Alt:%>sigut K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO:%>sigit K_TUQ ;
+V+Imp+2Pl+3PlO:%>sigik K_TUQ ;
+V+Opt+3Sg+2SgO:%>lisit K_TUQ ; !liv 20170503
+V+Opt+3Sg+3SgO:%>liuk K_TUQ ;
+V+Cont+3SgO:%>llugu K ; !liv 170127
